Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
FOREIGN PROTECTIVE ORDERS

[§586-21] Foreign protective orders.
Any valid protective order, as defined in 18 U.S.C. §2266, issued by a court or
tribunal of another state, tribe, or territory of the United States shall be
accorded full faith and credit by the courts of this State and shall be
enforced as if it were an order issued in this State. [L 2000, c 186, pt of §7]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next